Utah statutes.
30-3-17.   Power and jurisdiction of judge.

The judge of a district court may counsel either spouse or both and may in his discretion require one or both of them to appear before him and, in those counties where a domestic relations counselor has been appointed pursuant to this act, require them to file a petition for conciliation and to appear before such counselor, or may recommend the aid of a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, social service worker or other specialists or scientific expert, or the pastor, bishop or presiding officer of any religious denomination to which the parties may belong.  The power and jurisdiction granted by this act shall be in addition to that presently exercised by the district courts and shall not be in limitation thereof.

